Maryland, session 2026, HB0625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 24–2301 through 24–2303 and the subtitle “Subtitle 23. Animal Testing
and Research Contribution” of Article – Health – General of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Agriculture
SUBTITLE 25. HUMAN–RELEVANT RESEARCH FUND CONTRIBUTION COLLECTION.
2–2501.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “ANIMAL AND PLANT HEALTH INSPECTION SERVICE
FORM 7023” MEANS THE FORM REQUIRED TO BE SUBMITTED TO THE FEDERAL
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE UNDER 7 U.S.C. § 2143 AND 9 C.F.R. § 2.36.
– 1 –

Ch. 385 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2–2502.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 15 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2024, EACH
RESEARCH FACILITY THAT IS LOCATED IN THE STATE AND IS REQUIRED TO SUBMIT
AN ANIMAL AND PLANT HEALTH INSPECTION SERVICE FORM 7023 SHALL PAY TO
THE DEPARTMENT A CONTRIBUTION IN THE AMOUNT OF:
(1) $5,000 FOR UP TO 100 ANIMALS;
(2) $10,000 FOR MORE THAN 100 BUT NOT MORE THAN 500 ANIMALS;
(3) $55,000 FOR MORE THAN 500 BUT NOT MORE THAN 5,000
ANIMALS; AND
(4) $75,000 FOR MORE THAN 5,000 ANIMALS.
(B) THE AMOUNT OF THE CONTRIBUTION TO BE PAID UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE BASED ON THE TOTAL NUMBER OF ANIMALS
REPORTED IN COLUMN F ON THE MOST RECENTLY SUBMITTED ANIMAL AND PLANT
HEALTH INSPECTION SERVICE FORM 7023.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE FUNDS PAID UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO THE HUMAN–RELEVANT RESEARCH FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–4D–02 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
2–2503.
A RESEARCH FACILITY THAT FAILS TO PAY THE CONTRIBUTION REQUIRED
UNDER § 2–2502(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF NOT
MORE THAN $1,000 PER DAY.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –